Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  97.231 to
97.243.
SECTION 2. (1) A veterans’ remains coordinator or county veterans’ service officer shall
carry out the duties under ORS 97.231 to 97.243 in accordance with rules adopted by the De-
partment of Veterans’ Affairs.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may adopt rules to implement the provisions of
ORS 97.231 to 97.243.
Passed by House February 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2386 (HB 2386-INTRO) Page 1